Indiana, session 2026, HB1079.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Indiana:
SECTION 1. IC 7.1-1-3-9.3 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 9.3. The term "channel price" means a sale of wine
to a permittee, exclusively for on-premises consumption, at a
different price than what the same wine, in the same:
(1) size;
(2) container; and
(3) quantity;
is being sold to other permittees.
SECTION 2. IC 7.1-3-2-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 276, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. The holder of a brewer's permit
or an out-of-state brewer holding either a primary source of supply
permit or an out-of-state brewer's permit may do the following:
(1) Manufacture beer.
(2) Place beer in containers or bottles.
(3) Transport beer.
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(4) Sell and deliver beer to a person holding a beer wholesaler's
permit issued under IC 7.1-3-3.
(5) If the brewer manufactures, at all of the brewer's breweries, an
aggregate of not more than ninety thousand (90,000) barrels of
beer in a calendar year for sale or distribution within Indiana, the
permit holder may do the following:
(A) Sell and deliver a total of not more than thirty thousand
(30,000) barrels of beer in a calendar year to the following:
(i) A person holding a retailer or a dealer permit under this
title.
(ii) A consumer who purchases beer for direct shipment
under IC 7.1-3-26, if the permit holder holds a direct
beer seller's permit.
The total number of barrels of beer that the permit holder may
sell and deliver under this clause in a calendar year may not
exceed thirty thousand (30,000) barrels of beer.
(B) Be the proprietor of a restaurant that is not subject to the
minimum gross food sales or the minimum projected food
sales set forth in 905 IAC 1-41-2.
(C) Hold a beer retailer's permit, a wine retailer's permit, or a
liquor retailer's permit for a restaurant established under clause
(B).
(D) Transfer beer directly from the brewery to the restaurant
by means of:
(i) bulk containers; or
(ii) a continuous flow system.
(E) Install a window between the brewery and an adjacent
restaurant that allows the public and the permittee to view both
premises.
(F) Install a doorway or other opening between the brewery
and an adjacent restaurant that provides the public and the
permittee with access to both premises.
(G) Sell the brewery's beer by the glass for consumption on the
premises. Brewers permitted to sell beer by the glass under
this clause must make food available for consumption on the
premises. A brewer may comply with the requirements of this
clause by doing any of the following:
(i) Allowing a vehicle of transportation that is a food
establishment (as defined in IC 16-18-2-137) to serve food
near the brewer's licensed premises.
(ii) Placing menus in the brewer's premises of restaurants
that will deliver food to the brewery.
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(iii) Providing food prepared at the brewery.
(H) Sell and deliver beer to a consumer at the licensed
premises of the brewer or at the residence or office of the
consumer. Notwithstanding IC 7.1-1-3-20, the licensed
premises may include the brewery parking lot or an area
adjacent to the brewery that may only be used for the purpose
of conveying alcoholic beverages and other nonalcoholic items
to a customer subject to section 10 of this chapter, and may not
be used for point of sale purposes or any other purpose. Beer
may be delivered to a consumer's residence or office by a
third party delivery service under IC 7.1-3-34. The delivery
to a consumer may be made only in a quantity at any one (1)
time of not more than one-half (1/2) barrel, but the beer may
be contained in bottles or other permissible containers.
(I) Sell the brewery's beer as authorized by this section for
carryout on Sunday in a quantity at any one (1) time of not
more than five hundred seventy-six (576) ounces. A brewer's
beer may be sold under this clause at any address for which the
brewer holds a brewer's permit issued under this chapter if the
address is located within the same city boundaries in which the
beer was manufactured.
(J) With the approval of the commission, participate:
(i) individually; or
(ii) with other permit holders under this chapter, holders of
artisan distiller's permits, holders of farm winery permits, or
any combination of holders described in this item;
in a trade show or an exposition at which products of each
permit holder participant are displayed, promoted, and sold.
All of the permit holders may occupy the same tent, structure,
or building. The commission may not grant to a holder of a
permit under this chapter approval under this clause to
participate in a trade show or exposition for more than
seventy-five (75) days in a calendar year.
(K) Store or condition beer in a secure building that is:
(i) separate from the brewery; and
(ii) owned or leased by the permit holder.
(L) Transfer beer from a building described in clause (K) back
to the brewery.
(M) Sell or transfer beer directly to a beer wholesaler from a
building described in clause (K), but may not sell or transfer
beer from the building to any other permittee or a consumer.
The brewer shall maintain an adequate written record of the
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


beer transferred:
(i) between the brewery and the separate building; and
(ii) from the separate building to the wholesaler.
(N) Sell the brewery's beer to the holder of a supplemental
caterer's permit issued under IC 7.1-3-9.5 for on-premises
consumption only at an event that is held outdoors on property
that is contiguous to the brewery as approved by the
commission.
(O) Receive liquor from the holder of a distiller's permit issued
under IC 7.1-3-7 or the holder of an artisan distiller's permit
under IC 7.1-3-27 that is located in the same county as the
brewery for the purpose of carbonating and canning the liquor.
Upon the completion of canning of the liquor, the product
must be returned to the original production facility within
forty-eight (48) hours. The activity under this clause is not an
interest under IC 7.1-5-9.
(P) Receive beer from another permit holder under this
subdivision for the purpose of bottling and packaging the beer.
Upon completion of bottling and packaging the beer, the
product must be returned to the original permit holder who
manufactured the beer. The number of barrels of beer that a
permit holder receives, bottles, and packages under this clause
may not exceed the number of barrels of beer that the permit
holder produced from raw materials at the licensed premises
of the permit holder in the same calendar year. The activity
under this clause is not an interest under IC 7.1-5-9.
(Q) Sell or transfer beer directly to a food manufacturer
located in Indiana that is registered with the federal Food and
Drug Administration for the purpose of adding or integrating
the beer into a product or recipe.
(R) Manufacture beer for another permit holder under this
subdivision. Upon completion of manufacturing the beer, the
product must be transported to the permit holder for which the
beer was manufactured. To qualify under this clause:
(i) the permit holder for which the beer is manufactured
must have manufactured not less than forty (40) barrels of
beer produced from raw materials at the licensed premises
of the permit holder in the previous calendar year; and
(ii) the number of barrels of beer that a permit holder
manufactures under this clause may not exceed the number
of barrels of beer that the permit holder produced from raw
materials at the licensed premises of the permit holder in the
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


same calendar year.
All records required by the federal Alcohol and Tobacco Tax
and Trade Bureau regarding the number of barrels of beer
produced from raw materials at the licensed premises of a
permit holder must be made available to the commission upon
request. The activity under this clause is not an interest under
IC 7.1-5-9.
(S) Sell, donate, transport, and deliver beer to a qualified
organization for:
(i) an allowable event under IC 7.1-3-6.1;
(ii) a charity auction under IC 7.1-3-6.2; or
(iii) an event under IC 7.1-3-6.3.
(T) With the approval of the commission under clause (J),
participate in a farmers' market at which products of the permit
holder are displayed, promoted, and sold. The permit holder
may:
(i) provide samples of the brewery's beer for consumption on
the premises, subject to a limit of three (3) samples of not
more than six (6) ounces per person; and
(ii) sell six (6), twelve (12), and twenty-four (24) packs of
twelve (12) ounce or sixteen (16) ounce cans of the
brewery's beer in qualified containers for consumption off
the premises.
(6) If the brewer's brewery manufactures more than ninety
thousand (90,000) barrels of beer in a calendar year for sale or
distribution within Indiana, the permit holder may own a portion
of the corporate stock of another brewery that:
(A) is located in the same county as the brewer's brewery;
(B) manufactures less than ninety thousand (90,000) barrels of
beer in a calendar year; and
(C) is the proprietor of a restaurant that operates under
subdivision (5).
(7) Provide complimentary samples of beer that are:
(A) produced by the brewer; and
(B) offered to consumers for consumption on the brewer's
premises.
(8) Own a portion of the corporate stock of a sports corporation
that:
(A) manages a minor league baseball stadium located in the
same county as the brewer's brewery; and
(B) holds a beer retailer's permit, a wine retailer's permit, or a
liquor retailer's permit for a restaurant located in that stadium.
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(9) For beer described in IC 7.1-1-2-3(a)(4):
(A) may allow transportation to and consumption of the beer
on the licensed premises; and
(B) may not sell, offer to sell, or allow sale of the beer on the
licensed premises.
(10) Sell, donate, transport, and deliver beer to a qualified
organization for:
(A) an allowable event under IC 7.1-3-6.1;
(B) a charity auction under IC 7.1-3-6.2; or
(C) an event under IC 7.1-3-6.3.
SECTION 3. IC 7.1-3-4-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2024,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) The holder of a beer retailer's permit shall
be entitled to purchase beer for sale under the permit only from a
permittee entitled to sell to the beer retailer under this title. A beer
retailer shall be entitled to possess beer and sell beer at retail to a
customer for consumption on the licensed premises. A beer retailer also
shall be entitled to sell beer to a customer and deliver beer in
permissible containers to the customer on the licensed premises, or to
the customer's house or office. A beer retailer also shall be entitled
to prepare, sell, and deliver beer in qualified containers to the
customer on the licensed premises or to the customer's house or
office. This delivery may only be performed by:
(1) the permit holder or an employee who holds an employee
permit; or
(2) a third party delivery service under IC 7.1-3-34.
The permit holder shall maintain a written record of each delivery for
at least one (1) year that shows the customer's name, location of
delivery, and quantity sold. Subject to subsection (g), (h), a beer
retailer also may prepare and package beer in qualified containers for
sale and delivery to a customer on the licensed premises for
consumption off the licensed premises.
(b) A beer retailer shall not be entitled to sell beer at wholesale. A
beer retailer shall not be entitled to sell and deliver beer on the street
or at the curb outside the licensed premises, nor shall a beer retailer be
entitled to sell beer at a place other than the licensed premises.
However, a beer retailer may offer food service (excluding alcoholic
beverages) to a patron who is outside the licensed premises by
transacting business through a window in the licensed premises.
(c) A beer retailer shall be entitled to sell and deliver warm or cold
beer for carry out, or for at-home delivery or to a customer's office, in
barrels or other commercial containers in a quantity that does not
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


exceed fifteen and one-half (15 1/2) gallons at any one (1) time. A beer
retailer that delivers beer to a customer's residence or to a customer's
office must require the customer to provide proof of age in accordance
with IC 7.1-5-10-23.
(d) A delivery performed by a third party delivery service must
comply with IC 7.1-3-34 and is not subject to subsections (e)
through (g).
(d) (e) Notwithstanding IC 7.1-1-3-20, the licensed premises of the
beer retailer may include the beer retailer parking lot or an area
adjacent to the beer retailer that may only be used for the purpose of
conveying alcoholic beverages and other nonalcoholic items to a
customer, and may not be used for point of sale purposes or any other
purpose. Any alcoholic beverages conveyed to the customer must
satisfy the following:
(1) Alcoholic beverages that are in the sealed original containers
must be placed in a bag that is stamped, printed, or labeled on the
outside: "CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES".
(2) Alcoholic beverages that are prepared by the beer retailer
must be packaged by the beer retailer in qualified containers that
are:
(A) stamped, printed, or labeled on the outside: "CONTAINS
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES"; or
(B) placed in a bag stamped, printed, or labeled on the outside:
"CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES".
(3) Placed by an employee of the permittee who is at least
twenty-one (21) years of age:
(A) in the trunk of the motor vehicle; or
(B) behind the last upright seat of the motor vehicle, if the
motor vehicle is not equipped with a trunk.
A retailer permittee may only convey a customer's order of alcoholic
beverages to the customer, if the customer has also purchased a meal
from the retailer permittee that is conveyed to the customer at the same
time as the alcoholic beverages.
(e) (f) The employee of the permittee that conveys the alcoholic
beverages to the customer must require the customer to provide proof
of age in accordance with IC 7.1-5-10-23.
(f) (g) The parking lot or area where the alcoholic beverages are
conveyed to the customer must be:
(1) well lit; and
(2) within clear view of the main entrance to the building of the
retailer premises.
(g) (h) If a beer retailer prepares and packages beer:
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(1) for sale and delivery to a customer on the licensed premises
for consumption off the licensed premises; and
(2) in a container that is not in a qualified container;
the commission may revoke the beer retailer's privilege under this
section of preparing and packaging beer for sale and delivery to a
customer in a qualified container.
SECTION 4. IC 7.1-3-5-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2025,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The holder of a beer dealer's permit shall be
entitled to purchase beer for sale under the permit only from a
permittee entitled to sell to a beer dealer under this title.
(b) A beer dealer shall be entitled to possess beer and sell it at retail
to a customer in permissible containers only.
(c) A beer dealer may not sell beer by the drink nor for consumption
on the licensed premises nor shall a beer dealer allow it to be consumed
on the licensed premises.
(d) Except as provided in subsection (e), a beer dealer shall be
entitled to sell beer to a customer and deliver it in permissible
containers to the customer on the licensed premises, or to the
customer's residence or office. A beer dealer shall not be entitled to sell
and deliver beer on the street or at the curb outside the licensed
premises, nor shall a beer dealer be entitled to sell beer at a place other
than the licensed premises. This delivery may only be performed by:
(1) the permit holder or an employee who holds an employee
permit; or
(2) a third party delivery service under IC 7.1-3-34.
However, notwithstanding IC 7.1-5-10-11, a beer dealer who is
licensed pursuant to IC 7.1-3-10-4 shall be entitled to sell and deliver
warm or cold beer for carry-out, or for delivery to a customer's
residence or office, or in accordance with subdivision (1) or (2). A
beer dealer licensed under IC 7.1-3-10-4 is also entitled to sell and
deliver warm or cold beer for delivery to a designated location, in
accordance with subdivision (1), in barrels or other commercial
containers that do not exceed two thousand sixteen (2,016) ounces per
container. The permit holder shall maintain a written record of each
delivery for at least one (1) year that shows the customer's name,
location of delivery, and quantity sold.
(e) Unless a beer dealer is a grocery store or drug store, a beer
dealer may not sell or deliver alcoholic beverages or any other item
through a window in the licensed premises to a patron who is outside
the licensed premises. A beer dealer that is a grocery store or drug store
may sell any item except alcoholic beverages through a window in the
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


licensed premises to a patron who is outside the licensed premises.
SECTION 5. IC 7.1-3-9-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2024,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. (a) The holder of a liquor retailer's permit shall
be entitled to purchase liquor only from a permittee entitled to sell to
the liquor retailer under this title including a package liquor store
under IC 7-3-10-5. A liquor retailer shall be entitled to possess liquor
and sell liquor at retail to a customer for consumption on the licensed
premises. A liquor retailer also shall be entitled to sell liquor to a
customer and deliver liquor in permissible containers to the customer
on the licensed premises, or to the customer's house or office. A liquor
retailer also shall be entitled to prepare, sell, and deliver liquor in
qualified containers to the customer on the licensed premises or to
the customer's house or office. This delivery may only be performed
by:
(1) the permit holder or an employee who holds an employee
permit; or
(2) a third party delivery service under IC 7.1-3-34.
The permit holder shall maintain a written record of each delivery for
at least one (1) year that shows the customer's name, location of
delivery, and quantity sold. Subject to subsection (g), (h), a liquor
retailer also may prepare and package liquor in qualified containers for
sale and delivery to a customer on the licensed premises for
consumption off the licensed premises.
(b) A liquor retailer shall not be entitled to sell liquor at wholesale.
A liquor retailer shall not be entitled to sell and deliver liquor on the
street or at the curb outside the licensed premises, nor shall a liquor
retailer be entitled to sell liquor at a place other than the licensed
premises. However, a liquor retailer may offer food service (excluding
alcoholic beverages) to a patron who is outside the licensed premises
by transacting business through a window in the licensed premises.
(c) A liquor retailer shall not be entitled to sell and deliver liquor for
carry out or for at-home delivery, in a quantity that exceeds four (4)
quarts at any one (1) time. A liquor retailer that delivers liquor to a
customer's residence or office must require the customer to provide
proof of age in accordance with IC 7.1-5-10-23.
(d) A delivery performed by a third party delivery service must
comply with IC 7.1-3-34 and is not subject to subsections (e)
through (g).
(d) (e) Notwithstanding IC 7.1-1-3-20, the licensed premises of the
liquor retailer may include the liquor retailer parking lot or an area
adjacent to the liquor retailer that may only be used for the purpose of
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


conveying alcoholic beverages and other nonalcoholic items to a
customer, and may not be used for point of sale purposes or any other
purpose. Any alcoholic beverages conveyed to the customer must
satisfy the following:
(1) Alcoholic beverages that are in the sealed original containers
must be placed in a bag that is stamped, printed, or labeled on the
outside: "CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES".
(2) Alcoholic beverages that are prepared by the liquor retailer
must be packaged by the liquor retailer in qualified containers
that are:
(A) stamped, printed, or labeled on the outside: "CONTAINS
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES"; or
(B) placed in a bag stamped, printed, or labeled on the outside:
"CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES".
(3) Placed by an employee of the permittee who is at least
twenty-one (21) years of age:
(A) in the trunk of the motor vehicle; or
(B) behind the last upright seat of the motor vehicle, if the
motor vehicle is not equipped with a trunk.
A retailer permittee may only convey a customer's order of alcoholic
beverages to the customer if the customer has also purchased a meal
from the retailer permittee that is conveyed to the customer at the same
time as the alcoholic beverages.
(e) (f) The employee of the permittee that conveys the alcoholic
beverages to the customer must require the customer to provide proof
of age in accordance with IC 7.1-5-10-23.
(f) (g) The parking lot or area where the alcoholic beverages are
conveyed to the customer or must be:
(1) well lit; and
(2) within clear view of the main entrance to the building of the
retailer premises.
(g) (h) If a liquor retailer prepares and packages liquor:
(1) for sale and delivery to a customer on the licensed premises
for consumption off the licensed premises; and
(2) in a container that is not in a qualified container;
the commission may revoke the liquor retailer's privilege under this
section of preparing and packaging liquor for sale and delivery to a
customer in a qualified container.
SECTION 6. IC 7.1-3-10-5 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A package liquor
store's exclusive business shall be the selling of the following
commodities only:
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(1) Liquor in its original package.
(2) Beer in permissible containers, if the permittee has the proper
permit.
(3) Wine in its original package.
(4) Bar supplies used in the preparation for consumption of
alcoholic beverages and in their consumption.
(5) Tobacco products.
(6) Uncooled and uniced charged water, carbonated soda, ginger
ale, mineral water, grenadine, and flavoring extracts.
(7) Printed materials.
(8) Lottery tickets as provided in IC 4-30-9.
(9) Cooled or uncooled nonalcoholic malt beverages.
(10) Flavored malt beverage in its original package.
(b) A package liquor store may sell liquor, beer, and wine to the
holder of a liquor retailer's permit under IC 7.1-3-9 or a catering
hall permit issued under IC 7.1-3-20-24.
SECTION 7. IC 7.1-3-10-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2025,
SECTION 5, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) The holder of a liquor dealer's permit shall
be entitled to purchase liquor only from a permittee entitled to sell to
a liquor dealer under this title.
(b) A liquor dealer shall be entitled to possess liquor and sell it at
retail in its original package to a customer only for consumption off the
licensed premises.
(c) A liquor dealer may deliver liquor only in permissible containers
to a customer's residence or office. This delivery may only be
performed by:
(1) the permit holder or an employee who holds an employee
permit; or
(2) a third party delivery service under IC 7.1-3-34.
However, a liquor dealer who is licensed under IC 7.1-3-10-4 may
deliver liquor in permissible containers to a customer's residence or
office, or in accordance with subdivision (1) or (2). A liquor dealer
licensed under IC 7.1-3-10-4 is also entitled to deliver liquor in
permissible containers to a designated location, if the delivery is
performed by the permit holder or an employee who holds an
employee permit. The permit holder shall maintain a written record of
each delivery for at least one (1) year that shows the customer's name,
location of delivery, and quantity sold.
(d) A liquor dealer may not sell or deliver alcoholic beverages or
any other item through a window in the licensed premises to a patron
who is outside the licensed premises. However, a liquor dealer that is
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


a drug store may sell prescription drugs and health and beauty aids
through a window in the licensed premises to a patron who is outside
the licensed premises.
SECTION 8. IC 7.1-3-12-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 277, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) The following apply to the
holder of a farm winery permit:
(1) A holder is entitled to manufacture wine and to place wine
produced by the permit holder's farm winery in bottles or other
permissible containers.
(2) A holder is entitled to serve complimentary samples of the
winery's wine on the licensed premises or an outside area that is
contiguous to the licensed premises, as approved by the
commission if each employee who serves wine on the licensed
premises:
(A) holds an employee's permit under IC 7.1-3-18-9; and
(B) completes a server training program approved by the
commission.
(3) A holder is entitled to sell the winery's wine on the licensed
premises to consumers either by:
(A) the glass;
(B) the bottle;
(C) a box that contains a bag designed for storing and
dispensing wine;
(D) any combination of receptacles listed in clauses (A)
through (C); or
(E) any other container permissible under federal law.
Notwithstanding IC 7.1-1-3-20, the licensed premises may
include the farm winery parking lot or an area adjacent to the farm
winery. The parking lot or an adjacent area may only be used for
the purpose of conveying alcoholic beverages and other
nonalcoholic items to a customer subject to section 5.5 of this
chapter, and may not be used for point of sale purposes or any
other purpose. The winery's wine may be delivered to a
consumer's residence or office by a third party delivery
service under IC 7.1-3-34.
(4) A holder is entitled to sell wine by:
(A) the bottle;
(B) the can;
(C) a box that contains a bag designed for storing and
dispensing wine;
(D) bulk container;
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(E) the case; or
(F) any combination of receptacles listed in clauses (A)
through (E);
to a person who is the holder of a permit to sell wine at wholesale.
(5) A holder is exempt from the provisions of IC 7.1-3-14.
(6) A holder is entitled to advertise the name and address of any
retailer or dealer who sells wine produced by the permit holder's
winery.
(7) A holder for wine described in IC 7.1-1-2-3(a)(4):
(A) may allow transportation to and consumption of the wine
on the licensed premises; and
(B) may not sell, offer to sell, or allow the sale of the wine on
the licensed premises.
(8) A holder is entitled to purchase and sell bulk wine as set forth
in this chapter.
(9) A holder is entitled to sell wine as authorized by this section
for carryout on Sunday.
(10) A holder is entitled to sell and ship the farm winery's wine to
a person located in another state in accordance with the laws of
the other state.
(11) A holder is entitled to sell the farm winery's wine to the
holder of a supplemental caterer's permit issued under
IC 7.1-3-9.5 for on-premises consumption only at an event that is
held outdoors on property that is contiguous to the farm winery as
approved by the commission.
(12) A holder is entitled to be the proprietor of a restaurant that is
not subject to the minimum gross food sales or the minimum
projected food sales set forth in 905 IAC 1-41-2 and the gross
retail income requirements to sell carryout under IC 7.1-3-20-9.5.
A holder is entitled to conduct the following activities:
(A) Hold a beer retailer's permit, a wine retailer's permit, or a
liquor retailer's permit for a restaurant.
(B) Transfer wine directly from the farm winery to a restaurant
that the farm winery has an interest in by means of:
(i) bottles or cans;
(ii) bulk containers; or
(iii) a continuous flow system.
(C) Install a window between the farm winery and an adjacent
restaurant that allows the public and the holder of the permit
to view both premises.
(D) Install a doorway or other opening between the farm
winery and an adjacent restaurant that provides the public and
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


the holder of the permit with access to both the farm winery
and restaurant.
(13) A holder that does not distribute through an Indiana wine
wholesaler is entitled under the farm winery permit to sell and
deliver to a person holding a wine retailer or wine dealer permit
under this title a total of not more than three thousand (3,000)
gallons of the farm winery's wine in a calendar year, if the farm
winery has not sold in Indiana more than fifteen thousand
(15,000) gallons the previous calendar year. A holder that sells
and delivers under this subdivision shall comply with all
provisions applicable to a wholesaler in 905 IAC 1-5.1, 905
IAC 1-5.2, 905 IAC 1-21, 905 IAC 1-31, and 905 IAC 1-32.1.
(14) A holder may sell, donate, transport, and deliver wine to a
qualified organization conducting any of the following:
(A) An allowable event under IC 7.1-3-6.1.
(B) A charity auction under IC 7.1-3-6.2.
(C) An event under IC 7.1-3-6.3.
(b) With the approval of the commission, a holder of a permit under
this chapter may conduct business at not more than three (3) additional
locations that are separate from the winery. At the additional locations,
the holder of a permit may conduct any business that is authorized at
the first location, except for manufacturing wine or placing wine in
bottles or containers.
(c) A farm winery may transfer wine from a storage facility or an
additional location described in subsection (b). A farm winery may sell
or transfer wine directly to a wine wholesaler from a storage facility
separate from the farm winery or an additional location described in
subsection (b). A farm winery may not sell or transfer wine from a
storage facility to any other permittee or a consumer. The farm winery
shall maintain an adequate written record of wine transferred:
(1) between the farm winery and the storage facility; and
(2) from the storage facility to the wholesaler.
(d) With the approval of the commission, a holder of a permit under
this chapter may:
(1) individually; or
(2) with other permit holders under this chapter, holders of artisan
distiller's permits, holders of brewer's permits issued under
IC 7.1-3-2-2(b), or any combination of holders described in this
subdivision;
participate in a trade show or an exposition at which products of each
permit holder participant are displayed, promoted, and sold. All of the
permit holders may occupy the same tent, structure, or building. The
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


commission may not grant approval under this subsection to a holder
of a permit under this chapter for more than seventy-five (75) days in
a calendar year.
(e) With the approval of the commission under subsection (d), a
holder of a permit may participate in a farmers' market at which
products of the permit holder are displayed, promoted, and sold. The
permit holder may:
(1) provide samples of the permit holder's wine for consumption
on the premises, subject to a limit of three (3) samples of not
more than one (1) ounce per person; and
(2) sell the permit holder's wine in a qualified container for
consumption off the premises.
SECTION 9. IC 7.1-3-14-4, AS AMENDED BY P.L.167-2024,
SECTION 7, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. (a) The holder of a wine retailer's permit is
entitled to purchase wine only from a permittee entitled to sell to the
wine retailer under this title. A wine retailer is entitled to possess wine
and sell wine at retail to a customer for consumption on the licensed
premises. A wine retailer is also entitled to sell wine to a customer and
deliver wine in permissible containers to the customer on the licensed
premises or to the customer's house or office. A wine retailer also
shall be entitled to prepare, sell, and deliver wine in qualified
containers to the customer on the licensed premises or to the
customer's house or office. This delivery may only be performed by:
(1) the permit holder or an employee who holds an employee
permit; or
(2) a third party delivery service under IC 7.1-3-34.
The permit holder shall maintain a written record of each delivery for
at least one (1) year that shows the customer's name, location of
delivery, and quantity sold. Subject to subsection (g), (h), a wine
retailer also may prepare and package wine in qualified containers for
sale and delivery to a customer on the licensed premises for
consumption off the licensed premises.
(b) A wine retailer is not entitled to sell wine at wholesale. A wine
retailer is not entitled to sell and deliver wine on the street or at the
curb outside the licensed premises, nor is the wine retailer entitled to
sell wine at a place other than the licensed premises. However, a wine
retailer may offer food service (excluding alcoholic beverages) to a
patron who is outside the licensed premises by transacting business
through a window in the licensed premises.
(c) A wine retailer is entitled to sell and deliver wine for carry out,
or for at-home delivery. A wine retailer that delivers wine to a
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


customer's residence or office must require the customer to provide
proof of age in accordance with IC 7.1-5-10-23.
(d) A delivery performed by a third party delivery service must
comply with IC 7.1-3-34 and is not subject to subsections (e)
through (g).
(d) (e) Notwithstanding IC 7.1-1-3-20, the licensed premises of the
wine retailer may include the wine retailer parking lot or an area
adjacent to the wine retailer that may only be used for the purpose of
conveying alcoholic beverages and other nonalcoholic items to a
customer and may not be used for point of sale purposes or any other
purpose. Any alcoholic beverages conveyed to the customer must
satisfy the following:
(1) Alcoholic beverages that are in the sealed original containers
must be placed in a bag that is stamped, printed, or labeled on the
outside: "CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES".
(2) Alcoholic beverages that are prepared by the wine retailer
must be packaged by the wine retailer in qualified containers that
are:
(A) stamped, printed, or labeled on the outside: "CONTAINS
ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES"; or
(B) placed in a bag stamped, printed, or labeled on the outside:
"CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC BEVERAGES".
(3) Placed by an employee of the permittee who is at least
twenty-one (21) years of age:
(A) in the trunk of the motor vehicle; or
(B) behind the last upright seat of the motor vehicle, if the
motor vehicle is not equipped with a trunk.
A retailer permittee may only convey a customer's order of alcoholic
beverages to the customer, if the customer has also purchased a meal
from the retailer permittee that is conveyed to the customer at the same
time as the alcoholic beverages.
(e) (f) The employee of the permittee that conveys the alcoholic
beverages to the customer must require the customer to provide proof
of age in accordance with IC 7.1-5-10-23.
(f) (g) The parking lot or area where the alcoholic beverages are
conveyed to the customer must be:
(1) well lit; and
(2) within clear view of the main entrance to the building of the
retailer premises.
(g) (h) If a wine retailer prepares and packages wine:
(1) for sale and delivery to a customer on the licensed premises
for consumption off the licensed premises; and
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(2) in a container that is not in a qualified container;
the commission may revoke the wine retailer's privilege under this
section of preparing and packaging wine for sale and delivery to a
customer in a qualified container.
SECTION 10. IC 7.1-3-15-3, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 284, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. (a) The holder of a wine dealer's
permit shall be entitled to purchase wine only from a permittee who is
authorized to sell to a wine dealer under this title. A wine dealer shall
be entitled to sell wine for consumption off the licensed premises only
and not by the drink.
(b) A wine dealer shall be entitled to sell wine in permissible
containers. However, a wine dealer who is licensed under
IC 7.1-3-10-4 may possess wine and sell it at retail in its original
package to a customer only for consumption off the licensed premises.
(c) Unless a wine dealer is a grocery store or drug store, a wine
dealer may not sell or deliver alcoholic beverages or any other item
through a window in the licensed premises to a patron who is outside
the licensed premises. A wine dealer that is a grocery store or drug
store may sell any item except alcoholic beverages through a window
in the licensed premises to a person who is outside the licensed
premises.
(d) A wine dealer may deliver wine as follows:
(1) Except as provided in subdivision (2), only in permissible
containers to a customer's (A) residence or (B) office delivered
by:
(A) the permit holder or an employee who holds an
employee permit; or
(B) a third party delivery service under IC 7.1-3-34.
(2) In the case of a wine dealer who is licensed under
IC 7.1-3-10-4, only in permissible containers to a customer's:
(A) residence or (B) office delivered by:
(i) the permit holder or an employee who holds an
employee permit; or
(ii) a third party delivery service under IC 7.1-3-34; or
(C) (B) designated location delivered by the permit holder
or an employee who holds an employee permit.
A wine delivery may only be performed by the permit holder or an
employee who holds an employee permit. The permit holder shall
maintain a written record of each delivery for at least one (1) year that
shows the customer's name, location of delivery, and quantity sold.
(e) The holder of a wine dealer's permit may sell, donate, transport,
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


and deliver wine to a qualified organization for:
(1) an allowable event under IC 7.1-3-6.1;
(2) a charity auction under IC 7.1-3-6.2; or
(3) an event under IC 7.1-3-6.3.
SECTION 11. IC 7.1-3-20-24 IS AMENDED TO READ AS
FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 24. (a) This section
does not affect the requirements necessary to obtain a permit to sell
alcoholic beverages on the premises of a licensed premises.
(b) The commission may designate a licensed permit premises used
exclusively for catered events as a catering hall.
(c) Catering halls designated under this section are not required to
be open to the general public. However, if a designated catering hall
desires to host an event that is open to the general public, the catering
hall shall comply with the notice requirement under IC 7.1-3-9.5-2. A
catering hall with a special three-way catering hall permit under
subsection (d) may not be open to the general public.
(d) The commission may issue a special three-way catering hall
permit to an applicant to sell alcoholic beverages for on premises
consumption on a premises that:
(1) is used only for private catered events as a catering hall; and
(2) has accommodations for at least two hundred fifty (250)
individuals.
An applicant who is issued a permit under this subsection is not
required to obtain a restaurant permit.
(e) A permit authorized by subsection (d) may be issued without
regard to the quota provisions of IC 7.1-3-22.
(f) The holder of a catering hall permit issued under this section
shall be entitled to purchase beer, wine, and liquor from a package
liquor store.
(f) (g) The commission shall adopt rules under IC 4-22-2 to
implement this section.
SECTION 12. IC 7.1-3-21-15, AS AMENDED BY P.L.145-2024,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 15. (a) This section does not apply to an
employee's permit under IC 7.1-3-18-9.
(b) The commission shall not renew or transfer a wholesaler,
retailer, dealer, or other permit of any type if the applicant:
(1) is seeking a renewal and the applicant has not paid all the:
(A) property taxes under IC 6-1.1 that the applicant is
statutorily or contractually obligated to pay; and
(B) the innkeeper's tax under IC 6-9;
that are due currently;
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(2) is seeking a transfer and the applicant has not paid all the:
(A) property taxes under IC 6-1.1 that the applicant is
statutorily or contractually obligated to pay; and
(B) innkeeper's tax under IC 6-9;
for the assessment periods during which the transferor held the
permit;
(3) is seeking a renewal or transfer and is at least thirty (30) days
delinquent in remitting:
(A) state gross retail taxes under IC 6-2.5; or
(B) withholding taxes required to be remitted under IC 6-3-4;
(4) is on the most recent tax warrant list supplied to the
commission by the department of state revenue; or
(5) does not provide the commission with property tax clearance
Form 1.
(c) The commission shall renew or transfer a permit that the
commission denied under subsection (b) when the appropriate one (1)
of the following occurs:
(1) The person, if seeking a renewal, provides to the commission
a statement from the county treasurer of the county in which the
property of the applicant was assessed indicating that all:
(A) the property taxes under IC 6-1.1 that the applicant is
statutorily or contractually obligated to pay; and
(B) in a county where the county treasurer collects the
innkeeper's tax, the innkeeper's tax under IC 6-9;
that were delinquent have been paid.
(2) The person, if seeking a transfer of ownership, provides to the
commission a statement from the county treasurer of the county
in which the property of the transferor was assessed indicating
that all:
(A) the property taxes under IC 6-1.1 that the applicant is
statutorily or contractually obligated to pay; and
(B) in a county where the county treasurer collects the
innkeeper's tax, the innkeeper's tax under IC 6-9;
have been paid for the assessment periods during which the
transferor held the permit.
(3) The person provides to the commission a statement from the
commissioner of the department of state revenue indicating that
the person's tax warrant has been satisfied, including any
delinquency in innkeeper's tax if the state collects the innkeeper's
tax for the county in which the person seeks the permit.
(4) The commission receives a notice from the commissioner of
the department of state revenue under IC 6-8.1-8-2(k).
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(5) The commission receives a notice from the commissioner of
the department of state revenue stating that:
(A) the state gross retail taxes; and
(B) withholding taxes;
described in subsection (b)(3) have been remitted to the
department.
(d) The commission shall not issue a new wholesaler, retailer,
dealer, or other permit of any type if the applicant:
(1) has not paid all the applicant's:
(A) property taxes under IC 6-1.1 that the applicant is
statutorily or contractually obligated to pay; and
(B) innkeeper's tax under IC 6-9 that are due;
(2) is at least thirty (30) days delinquent in remitting:
(A) state gross retail taxes under IC 6-2.5; or
(B) withholding taxes required to be remitted under IC 6-3-4;
(3) is on the most recent tax warrant list supplied to the
commission by the department of state revenue; or
(4) does not provide the commission with property tax clearance
Form 1.
(e) The commission shall issue a new permit that the commission
denied under subsection (d) when one (1) of the following occurs:
(1) The applicant provides to the commission a statement from
the commissioner of the department of state revenue indicating
that the applicant's tax warrant has been satisfied, including any
delinquency in innkeeper's tax if the state collects the innkeeper's
tax for the county in which the applicant seeks the permit.
(2) The commission receives a notice of release from the
commissioner of the department of state revenue under
IC 6-8.1-8-2(k).
(3) The commission receives a notice from the commissioner of
the department of state revenue stating that:
(A) the state gross retail taxes; and
(B) withholding taxes;
described in subsection (d)(2) have been remitted to the
department.
(f) An applicant for issuance of a new permit, renewal, or transfer
may not be considered delinquent in the payment of a listed tax (as
defined by IC 6-8.1-1-1) if the applicant has filed a proper protest
under IC 6-8.1-5-1 contesting the remittance of those taxes. The
applicant shall be considered delinquent in the payment of those taxes
if the applicant does not remit the taxes owed to the state department
of revenue after the later of the following:
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(1) The expiration of the period in which the applicant may appeal
the listed tax to the tax court, in the case of an applicant who does
not file a timely appeal of the listed tax.
(2) When a decision of the tax court concerning the applicant's
appeal of the listed tax becomes final, in the case of an applicant
who files a timely appeal of the listed tax.
(g) The commission may require that an applicant for the issuance
of a new permit, renewal, or transfer of a wholesaler's, retailer's, or
dealer's, or other permit of any type furnish proof of the payment of a
listed tax (as defined by IC 6-8.1-1-1), tax warrant, or taxes imposed by
IC 6-1.1 or receipt of property tax clearance Form 1.
(h) The commission may issue to any applicant for renewal of a
permit that is delinquent in the payment of a listed tax (as defined in
IC 6-8.1-1-1) not more than one (1) ninety (90) day extension of the
term of the permit.
SECTION 13. IC 7.1-3-22.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 22.5. Dealers' Permits Not Subject to Quota
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "permit" means a permit issued
under this chapter.
Sec. 2. The commission may issue a:
(1) beer dealer's permit; or
(2) wine dealer's permit;
that is not subject to the quota provisions of IC 7.1-3-22.
Sec. 3. The commission shall charge an initial permit fee and
annual renewal fee under IC 7.1-4-4.1-12.5.
Sec. 4. A permit is subject to all of the following:
(1) The ownership of a permit may not be transferred.
(2) The location for which the permit was issued may not be
transferred.
(3) Notwithstanding IC 7.1-3-1.1, if the business operations
cease at the permit premises for more than six (6) months:
(A) the permit reverts to the commission; and
(B) the permit holder is not entitled to any refund or other
compensation.
SECTION 14. IC 7.1-3-26-1, AS ADDED BY P.L.165-2006,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. This chapter does not apply to the serving or
selling of:
(1) wine in accordance with IC 7.1-3-12; or
(2) brandy in accordance with IC 7.1-3-7.5; or
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(3) beer in accordance with IC 7.1-3-2.
SECTION 15. IC 7.1-3-26-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.165-2006,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "applicant" means a
person that applies to the commission for a:
(1) direct wine seller's permit; or
(2) direct beer seller's permit.
SECTION 16. IC 7.1-3-26-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.165-2006,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "consumer" means an
individual with an Indiana address who purchases wine product from
a seller.
SECTION 17. IC 7.1-3-26-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. As used in this chapter,
"product" means the alcoholic beverage that a seller's permit
authorizes the seller to sell and ship directly to a consumer as
follows:
(1) If the seller holds a direct wine seller's permit, "product"
means wine.
(2) If the seller holds a direct beer seller's permit, "product"
means beer.
SECTION 18. IC 7.1-3-26-4, AS ADDED BY P.L.165-2006,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "seller" means the
holder of:
(1) a direct wine seller's permit; or
(2) a direct beer seller's permit;
issued under this chapter.
SECTION 19. IC 7.1-3-26-5, AS AMENDED BY P.L.159-2014,
SECTION 4, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 5. (a) A person located within Indiana or outside
Indiana that wants to sell and ship product to a consumer must
comply with the following:
(1) A person that wants to sell and ship wine directly to a
consumer must:
(A) be the holder of a valid direct wine seller's permit; and
(B) comply with this chapter.
(2) A person that wants to sell and ship beer directly to a
consumer must:
(A) be the holder of a valid direct beer seller's permit; and
(B) comply with this chapter.
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


A person that sells and ships wine product directly to a consumer
without holding a valid direct wine seller's the appropriate permit as
set forth in this subsection commits a Class A infraction.
(b) The offense described in subsection (a) is:
(1) a Class A misdemeanor if the seller:
(A) knowingly or intentionally violates this section; and
(B) has one (1) prior unrelated conviction or judgment for an
infraction under this chapter for an act or omission that
occurred not more than ten (10) years before the act or
omission that is the basis for the most recent conviction or
judgment for an infraction; and
(2) a Level 6 felony if the seller:
(A) knowingly or intentionally violates this section; and
(B) has at least two (2) prior unrelated convictions or
judgments for infractions under this chapter for acts or
omissions that occurred not more than ten (10) years before
the act or omission that is the basis for the most recent
conviction or judgment for an infraction.
SECTION 20. IC 7.1-3-26-6, AS AMENDED BY P.L.107-2015,
SECTION 6, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 6. (a) A seller may sell and ship wine product
directly only to a consumer who meets all of the following
requirements:
(1) The consumer is at least twenty-one (21) years of age.
(2) The consumer has an Indiana address.
(3) The consumer intends to use wine product purchased under
this chapter for personal use only and not for resale or other
commercial purposes.
(b) A seller who violates this section commits a Class A infraction.
However, the offense is:
(1) a Class A misdemeanor if the seller:
(A) knowingly or intentionally violates this section; and
(B) has one (1) prior unrelated conviction or judgment for an
infraction under this chapter for an act or omission that
occurred not more than ten (10) years before the act or
omission that is the basis for the most recent conviction or
judgment for an infraction; and
(2) a Level 6 felony if the seller:
(A) knowingly or intentionally violates this section; and
(B) has at least two (2) prior unrelated convictions or
judgments for infractions under this chapter for acts or
omissions that occurred not more than ten (10) years before
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


the act or omission that is the basis for the most recent
conviction or judgment for an infraction.
SECTION 21. IC 7.1-3-26-7.1 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7.1. (a) The commission may issue
a direct beer seller's permit to an applicant who meets all of the
following requirements:
(1) The applicant is domiciled and has its principal place of
business in the United States.
(2) The applicant is engaged in the manufacture of beer.
(3) The applicant holds and acts within the scope of authority
of an alcoholic beverage license or permit to manufacture
beer that is required:
(A) in Indiana or the state where the applicant is
domiciled; and
(B) by the Tax and Trade Bureau of the United States
Department of the Treasury.
(4) The applicant qualifies with the secretary of state to do
business in Indiana and consents to the personal jurisdiction
of the commission and the courts of Indiana.
(5) The applicant completes documentation regarding the
applicant's application required by the commission.
(b) The commission may issue a direct beer seller's permit to an
applicant who:
(1) meets the requirements under subsection (a); and
(2) holds a permit issued under this title that allows the sale of
an alcoholic beverage at retail.
(c) Nothing in this chapter:
(1) prohibits a holder of a direct beer seller's permit from also
distributing beer through a wholesaler; or
(2) affects any agreement that a holder of a direct beer seller's
permit enters into with a wholesaler.
SECTION 22. IC 7.1-3-26-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.107-2015,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The term of a direct wine seller's permit or
a direct beer seller's permit begins:
(1) on the date approved by the commission for an initial
application; and
(2) on July 1 to renew a permit;
and expires on June 30 of the following year. A direct wine seller's
permit or direct beer seller's permit may be renewed in accordance
with rules adopted by the commission.
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(b) The annual direct wine seller's permit fee is as follows:
(1) One hundred dollars ($100) for a direct wine seller's permit
applicant who:
(A) has never previously held a direct wine seller's permit and
anticipates direct shipping in Indiana not more than nine
thousand (9,000) liters of wine in a permit year; or
(B) previously held a direct wine seller's permit and certifies
to the commission that the permit applicant direct shipped in
Indiana not more than nine thousand (9,000) liters of wine in
the previous permit year.
(2) Two hundred dollars ($200) for a direct wine seller's permit
applicant who:
(A) has never previously held a direct wine seller's permit and
anticipates direct shipping in Indiana not more than eighteen
thousand (18,000) liters of wine in a permit year; or
(B) previously held a direct wine seller's permit and certifies
to the commission that the permit applicant direct shipped in
Indiana not more than eighteen thousand (18,000) liters of
wine in the previous permit year.
(3) Three hundred dollars ($300) for a direct wine seller's permit
applicant who:
(A) has never previously held a direct wine seller's permit and
anticipates direct shipping in Indiana not more than
twenty-seven thousand (27,000) liters of wine in a permit year;
or
(B) previously held a direct wine seller's permit and certifies
to the commission that the permit applicant direct shipped in
Indiana not more than twenty-seven thousand (27,000) liters
of wine in the previous permit year.
(4) Four hundred dollars ($400) for a direct wine seller's permit
applicant who:
(A) has never previously held a direct wine seller's permit and
anticipates direct shipping in Indiana not more than thirty-six
thousand (36,000) liters of wine in a permit year; or
(B) previously held a direct wine seller's permit and certifies
to the commission that the permit applicant direct shipped in
Indiana not more than thirty-six thousand (36,000) liters of
wine in the previous permit year.
(5) Five hundred dollars ($500) for a direct wine seller's permit
applicant who:
(A) has never previously held a direct wine seller's permit and
anticipates direct shipping in Indiana not more than forty-five
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


thousand (45,000) liters of wine in a permit year; or
(B) previously held a direct wine seller's permit and certifies
to the commission that the permit applicant direct shipped in
Indiana not more than forty-five thousand (45,000) liters of
wine in the previous permit year.
(c) The annual direct beer seller's permit fee is one hundred fifty
dollars ($150).
SECTION 23. IC 7.1-3-26-9, AS AMENDED BY P.L.107-2015,
SECTION 9, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 9. A direct wine seller's permit or direct beer
seller's permit entitles a seller to sell and ship wine product to a
consumer by receiving and filling orders that the consumer transmits
by electronic or other means if all of the following conditions are
satisfied before the sale or by the times set forth as follows:
(1) The consumer provides the direct wine seller with the
following:
(A) The consumer's name.
(B) A valid delivery address and telephone number.
(C) Proof of age by a state government issued or federal
government issued identification card showing the consumer
to be at least twenty-one (21) years of age. The proof under
this clause may be evidenced:
(i) in person;
(ii) by a photocopy or facsimile copy that is mailed or
electronically transmitted;
(iii) by a computer scanned, electronically transmitted copy;
or
(iv) through an age verification service used by the direct
wine seller.
(2) The direct wine seller meets the following requirements:
(A) Maintains for two (2) years all records of wine product
sales made under this chapter. If the records are requested by
the commission, a direct wine seller shall:
(i) make the records available to the commission during the
direct wine seller's regular business hours; or
(ii) at the direction of the commission, deliver copies to the
commission.
(B) A direct wine seller stamps, prints, or labels on the
outside of the shipping container the following: "CONTAINS
WINE. SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE 21 OR OLDER
REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY.".
(C) A direct beer seller stamps, prints, or labels on the
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


outside of the shipping container the following:
"CONTAINS BEER. SIGNATURE OF PERSON AGE 21
OR OLDER REQUIRED FOR DELIVERY.".
(C) (D) Causes the wine product to be delivered by the holder
of a valid carrier's alcoholic beverage permit under
IC 7.1-3-18.
(D) (E) Directs the carrier to verify that the individual
personally receiving the wine product shipment is at least
twenty-one (21) years of age.
(E) (F) A direct wine seller does not ship to any consumer
more than two hundred sixteen (216) liters of wine in any
calendar year.
(G) A direct beer seller does not ship to any consumer
more than twenty-seven (27) gallons of beer in any
calendar year.
(F) (H) Remits to the department of state revenue monthly all
Indiana excise, sales, and use taxes on the shipments made
into Indiana by the direct wine seller during the previous
month.
(G) (I) Ships to a consumer in Indiana only wine product
manufactured, produced, or bottled by the applicant.
SECTION 24. IC 7.1-3-26-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.107-2015,
SECTION 11, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) During a permit year, a direct wine seller
may not direct ship in within or into Indiana more than forty-five
thousand (45,000) liters of wine.
(b) During a calendar year, a direct beer seller may not direct
ship within or into Indiana more than thirty thousand (30,000)
barrels of beer. If a direct beer seller holds a brewery permit under
IC 7.1-3-2-7(5), all beer shipped by the direct beer seller to a
consumer in a calendar year counts toward the seller's thirty
thousand (30,000) barrel limit for the calendar year under
IC 7.1-3-2-7(5)(A).
SECTION 25. IC 7.1-3-26-13, AS ADDED BY P.L.165-2006,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 13. A wine product shipment purchased under
this chapter must be delivered to:
(1) the consumer, who shall take personal delivery of the
shipment at the:
(A) consumer's residence;
(B) consumer's business address;
(C) carrier's business address; or
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(D) address displayed on the shipping container; or
(2) an individual who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age, who
shall take personal delivery of the shipment at the:
(A) consumer's residence;
(B) consumer's business address;
(C) carrier's business address; or
(D) address designated by the consumer and displayed on the
shipping container.
SECTION 26. IC 7.1-3-26-14, AS ADDED BY P.L.165-2006,
SECTION 34, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) A consumer may not receive more than
two hundred sixteen (216) liters of wine in total from one (1) or more
direct wine sellers in a calendar year.
(b) A consumer may not receive more than twenty-seven (27)
gallons of beer in total from one (1) or more direct beer sellers in
a calendar year.
SECTION 27. IC 7.1-3-27-8, AS AMENDED BY P.L.186-2025,
SECTION 285, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 8. (a) The holder of an artisan
distiller's permit may do only the following:
(1) Manufacture liquor, including blending liquor purchased from
another manufacturer with liquor the artisan distiller
manufactures under section 11 of this chapter.
(2) Bottle liquor manufactured by the artisan distiller.
(3) Insert liquor manufactured by the artisan distiller into a
container.
(4) Store liquor manufactured by the artisan distiller, including at
a facility located within ten (10) miles of the artisan distiller's
distillery.
(5) Transport, sell, and deliver liquor manufactured by the artisan
distiller to:
(A) places outside Indiana; or
(B) the holder of a liquor wholesaler's permit under IC 7.1-3-8.
(6) Sell liquor manufactured by the artisan distiller to consumers
by the drink, bottle, container, or case from the licensed premises
of the distillery where the liquor was manufactured.
Notwithstanding IC 7.1-1-3-20, the licensed premises may
include the distillery parking lot or an area adjacent to the artisan
distillery. The parking lot or adjacent area may only be used for
the purpose of conveying alcoholic beverages and other
nonalcoholic items to a customer subject to section 8.1 of this
chapter and may not be used for point of sale purposes or any
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


other purpose. Liquor manufactured by the artisan distiller
may be delivered to a consumer's residence or office by a
third party delivery service under IC 7.1-3-34.
(7) Serve complimentary samples of the liquor manufactured by
the artisan distiller to consumers on the premises of the distillery
where the liquor was manufactured.
(8) Sell liquor as authorized by this section for carryout on
Sunday in a quantity at any one (1) time of not more than four and
five-tenths (4.5) liters.
(9) With the approval of the commission, participate:
(A) individually; or
(B) with other permit holders under this chapter, holders of
farm winery permits, holders of brewer's permits issued under
IC 7.1-3-2-2(b), or any combination of holders described in
this clause;
in a trade show or an exposition at which products of each permit
holder participant are displayed, promoted, and sold. All of the
permit holders may occupy the same tent, structure, or building.
The commission may not grant to a holder of a permit under this
chapter approval under this subdivision to participate in a trade
show or exposition for more than seventy-five (75) days in a
calendar year.
(10) Be the proprietor of a restaurant that is not subject to the
minimum gross food sales or the minimum projected food sales
set forth in 905 IAC 1-41-2 and the gross retail income
requirements to sell carryout under IC 7.1-3-20-9.5. A holder is
entitled to conduct the following activities:
(A) Hold a beer retailer's permit, a wine retailer's permit, or a
liquor retailer's permit for a restaurant.
(B) Transfer liquor directly from the artisan distillery to a
restaurant that the artisan distiller has an interest in by means
of:
(i) bottles;
(ii) bulk containers; or
(iii) a continuous flow system.
(C) Install a window between the artisan distillery and an
adjacent restaurant that allows the public and the holder of the
permit to view both premises.
(D) Install a doorway or other opening between the artisan
distillery and an adjacent restaurant that provides the public
and the holder of the permit with access to both the artisan
distillery and restaurant.
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(11) A holder that does not distribute through an Indiana liquor
wholesaler is entitled under the artisan distiller's permit to sell and
deliver to a person holding a liquor retailer or liquor dealer permit
under this title a total of not more than two thousand (2,000)
gallons of the artisan distillery's liquor in a calendar year, if the
artisan distiller has not sold in Indiana more than ten thousand
(10,000) gallons the previous calendar year. A holder that sells
and delivers under this subdivision shall comply with all
provisions applicable to a wholesaler in 905 IAC 1-5.1, 905
IAC 1-5.2, 905 IAC 1-21, 905 IAC 1-31, and 905 IAC 1-32.1.
(12) Sell, donate, transport, and deliver liquor manufactured by
the artisan distiller to a qualified organization for:
(A) an allowable event under IC 7.1-3-6.1;
(B) a charity auction under IC 7.1-3-6.2; or
(C) an event under IC 7.1-3-6.3.
(13) With the approval of the commission under subdivision (9),
the holder of a permit may participate in a farmers' market at
which products of the permit holder are displayed, promoted, and
sold. The holder of a permit:
(A) may not offer samples of liquor for consumption on the
premises; and
(B) may sell its liquor in qualified containers for consumption
off the premises.
(14) Manufacture liquor at the licensed premises for another
holder of an artisan distiller's permit. Upon completion of the
manufacturing of the liquor for another permit holder under this
subdivision, the product must be transported to the permit holder
for which the liquor was manufactured. To qualify under this
subdivision:
(A) the permit holder for which the liquor is manufactured
must have manufactured not less than forty (40) gallons of
liquor produced from raw materials at the permit holder's
licensed premises in the previous calendar year; and
(B) the total number of gallons of liquor that a permit holder
manufactures under this subdivision may not exceed the
number of gallons of liquor the permit holder produced from
raw materials at the permit holder's licensed premises in the
same calendar year.
All records required by the federal Alcohol and Tobacco Tax and
Trade Bureau regarding the number of gallons of liquor produced
from raw materials at the licensed premises of a permit holder
must be available to the commission upon request. The activity
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


under this subdivision is not an interest under IC 7.1-5-9.
(b) The holder of an artisan distiller's permit who provides samples
or sells liquor by the glass must furnish the minimum food
requirements prescribed by the commission.
(c) A storage facility used by an artisan distiller under subsection
(a)(4) must conform with federal laws, rules, and regulations. An
artisan distiller may transfer liquor from a separate storage facility back
to the artisan distillery. An artisan distiller may sell or transfer liquor
directly to a liquor wholesaler from a storage facility that is separate
from the artisan distillery. An artisan distiller may not sell or transfer
liquor from a storage facility to any other permittee or a consumer. The
artisan distiller shall maintain an adequate written record of the liquor
transferred:
(1) between the artisan distillery and the storage facility; and
(2) from the storage facility to the liquor wholesaler.
(d) The holder of an artisan distiller's permit may transport liquor to
and from a brewery located within the same county for the purposes of
carbonating and canning by the brewery. The activity under this
subsection is not an interest under IC 7.1-5-9.
(e) An artisan distiller who knowingly or intentionally violates this
section commits a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 28. IC 7.1-3-33 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 33. Delivery Driver Permit
Sec. 1. The commission may issue a delivery driver permit to an
individual who wants to deliver alcoholic beverages to customers
as an employee or independent contractor of a third party delivery
service under IC 7.1-3-34.
Sec. 2. To be eligible for or to continue to hold a delivery driver
permit, an individual must:
(1) be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;
(2) have a valid driver's license and adequate vehicle
coverage;
(3) not be a common carrier;
(4) not hold any permit under this title to manufacture, sell,
or wholesale alcoholic beverages;
(5) successfully complete a training program under
IC 7.1-3-34-19 or IC 7.1-3-34-20;
(6) pay the permit fee under IC 7.1-4-4.1-24;
(7) not have a conviction within the preceding five (5) years:
(A) for operating while intoxicated;
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(B) under IC 7.1-5-7-8 (furnishing alcohol to a minor); or
(C) under IC 7.1-5-7-2 (furnishing a minor with false
identification); and
(8) satisfy any other requirements of the commission.
Sec. 3. The following provisions regarding the issuance and
revocation of an employee's permit also apply to the issuance and
revocation of a delivery driver permit:
(1) IC 7.1-3-18-9(f) through IC 7.1-3-18-9(i).
(2) IC 7.1-3-18-9.5.
Sec. 4. The holder of a delivery driver permit, regardless of
whether the holder is an employee or independent contractor of a
third party delivery service, may only make alcoholic beverage
deliveries if the holder has entered into a written agreement with
the third party delivery service.
SECTION 29. IC 7.1-3-34 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW CHAPTER TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]:
Chapter 34. Third Party Delivery Service Permit
Sec. 1. As used in this chapter, "delivery driver" means a person
who transports alcoholic beverages for a permittee.
Sec. 2. As used in this chapter, "delivery order" means alcoholic
beverages that are purchased from a seller for delivery to the
purchaser's residence or office.
Sec. 3. As used in this chapter, "permit" means a third party
delivery service permit issued under this chapter.
Sec. 4. As used in this chapter, "permittee" means a person that
holds a third party delivery service permit.
Sec. 5. As used in this chapter, "seller" means the holder of a:
(1) retailer's permit;
(2) dealer's permit; or
(3) craft manufacturer's permit.
Sec. 6. A permittee may transport a delivery order for a seller,
if:
(1) the delivery order is transported from a location inside the
seller's licensed premises in Indiana to a customer's home or
office located within Indiana;
(2) the permittee has a written agreement with the seller to
make alcoholic beverage deliveries using the permittee's
delivery drivers;
(3) the permittee's delivery drivers:
(A) hold delivery driver permits under IC 7.1-3-33; and
(B) are employees of or have contracted with the
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


permittee;
(4) the permittee provides the commission with the:
(A) name;
(B) address; and
(C) delivery driver permit number;
of each of the permittee's delivery drivers; and
(5) the other requirements of this chapter are satisfied.
Sec. 7. A permittee must meet all of the following requirements:
(1) If the permittee is an individual, the person:
(A) is at least twenty-one (21) years of age; and
(B) has not been convicted of a felony set forth in
IC 7.1-3-4-2(3).
(2) The permittee has a physical address in Indiana and is
authorized to do business in Indiana.
(3) The permittee may not hold any other permit under
IC 7.1.
(4) The permittee may not be a common carrier.
(5) The permittee may not be disqualified under IC 7.1-3-4-2.
Sec. 8. An applicant must submit all of the following to the
commission with a permit application:
(1) A sample written agreement described in section 6(2) of
this chapter that:
(A) meets the requirements of this chapter; and
(B) the applicant intends to enter into with sellers.
(2) An outline or summary of an internal or external training
program for training the applicant's delivery drivers as
described in sections 19 and 20 of this chapter.
(3) Proof of a general liability insurance policy with coverage
of at least five hundred thousand dollars ($500,000) per
occurrence.
(4) Any other documentation or information required by the
commission.
Sec. 9. A delivery driver:
(1) must:
(A) be an employee or independent contractor of the
permittee;
(B) be at least twenty-one (21) years of age;
(C) have a valid driver's license; and
(D) have a valid delivery driver's permit under
IC 7.1-3-33; and
(2) must be certified as having completed a training program
established or approved by the commission under section 19
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


or 20 of this chapter.
Sec. 10. The commission may enforce the requirements of this
chapter against any employee or independent contractor of a
permittee.
Sec. 11. A delivery order must meet all of the following
requirements:
(1) A delivery order must be sold to the purchaser by the
seller who collects payment when the delivery order is placed.
If the permittee charges the purchaser a delivery fee as
provided in section 12 of this chapter, the delivery fee must be
collected at checkout and before delivery of the delivery
order.
(2) Alcoholic beverages must be:
(A) in:
(i) sealed original containers, if the seller has a dealer's
permit or a craft manufacturer's permit; or
(ii) qualified containers, if the seller has a retailer's
permit;
(B) placed:
(i) in a bag by the seller that is stamped, printed, or
labeled on the outside: "CONTAINS ALCOHOLIC
BEVERAGES"; and
(ii) in the trunk of the vehicle or if the alcoholic beverage
is in a qualified container, behind the last upright seat of
the motor vehicle.
(C) picked up by the permittee's delivery driver from a
location:
(i) inside the licensed premises of the seller; and
(ii) that is not outside in the seller's parking lot or an
area adjacent to the seller; and
(D) delivered from the seller's licensed premises during
regular business hours to the customer's residence or
office.
However, alcoholic beverages may not be delivered to an
address on the campus of a public or private college or
university (as defined in IC 21-7-13-10).
(3) If the delivery order is from a retailer permittee, the
delivery order must include a meal purchased by the
customer from the retailer permittee that is conveyed to the
customer at the same time as the alcoholic beverages.
(4) The seller must obtain confirmation that the purchaser
placing a delivery order is at least twenty-one (21) years of
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


age.
(5) A delivery order must be received by a person at the
delivery address who is at least twenty-one (21) years of age.
A delivery order may not be left unattended at the delivery
address.
(6) A delivery driver must obtain the delivery order
recipient's:
(A) proof of age in accordance with IC 7.1-5-10-23 using
identification scanning software technology at the point of
delivery to authenticate that the recipient is at least
twenty-one (21) years of age; and
(B) signature.
(7) A delivery driver shall return all alcoholic beverages to the
seller, if the person receiving the delivery order:
(A) is less than twenty-one (21) years of age;
(B) appears intoxicated;
(C) fails or refuses to:
(i) provide proof of age in accordance with
IC 7.1-5-10-23;
(ii) provide a signature; or
(iii) complete the identification verification process; or
(D) refuses to accept the delivery.
Sec. 12. A permittee may charge a delivery fee to the purchaser
or the seller. The permittee does not engage in the sale of alcoholic
beverages by charging a delivery fee. The seller shall appear as the
merchant of record in the sales transaction.
Sec. 13. The commission may enforce the requirements of this
chapter by the same administrative proceedings that apply to all
other holders of an alcoholic beverage permit.
Sec. 14. Nothing in this section shall be construed to require a
technology services company to obtain a permit under this chapter,
if the technology services company:
(1) does not employ or contract with delivery drivers; and
(2) only provides software or a digital network application
that connects purchasers with sellers for placing delivery
orders.
Sec. 15. (a) The term of a permit begins on:
(1) the date approved by the commission for an initial
application; and
(2) July 1 to renew a permit;
and expires on June 30 of the second year following the year in
which the application was initially approved under subdivision (1)
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


or the permit was renewed under subdivision (2).
(b) A permit may be renewed in accordance with rules adopted
by the commission.
Sec. 16. A permittee shall maintain records containing the
following information for twenty-four (24) months after the date
of a delivery of alcoholic beverages:
(1) The name and address of the seller.
(2) The delivery date.
(3) The customer's name and address.
(4) The customer's proof of age verification and the delivery
recipient's proof of age verification.
(5) Each delivery driver's name, address, and delivery driver
permit number.
The third party delivery service shall make these records available
to the commission upon request.
Sec. 17. A permittee shall allow the commission to perform an
audit of the permittee's records upon request and with sufficient
notification.
Sec. 18. A permittee shall be considered to have consented to the
jurisdiction of the Indiana courts concerning enforcement of this
chapter and any related laws or rules.
Sec. 19. The commission shall approve a training program
established by a permittee or third party provider that:
(1) educates individuals on the delivery of alcoholic beverages,
including training in:
(A) identifying:
(i) an underage person;
(ii) an intoxicated person; and
(iii) a false or altered photographic identification card;
and
(B) handling situations in which the delivery driver is
required by law to decline to deliver the alcoholic
beverages and return the delivery order to the seller; and
(2) certifies when an individual successfully completes the
training program.
Sec. 20. In addition to approving training programs, the
commission may establish a training program and provide
certification of delivery drivers.
Sec. 21. A permittee must ensure that each delivery driver is
certified as completing a training program that is approved or
established by the commission before the delivery driver makes
deliveries of alcoholic beverages. The permittee must maintain
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


copies of each delivery driver's training certification.
Sec. 22. The commission may:
(1) suspend or revoke a delivery service permit or delivery
driver permit, or both; and
(2) impose civil penalties against the holder of a permit under
IC 7.1-3-23.
for any delivery of alcoholic beverages that is made by the delivery
driver for the delivery service permit holder in violation of IC 7.1,
regardless of whether the delivery driver is an employee or
independent contractor of the permittee.
Sec. 23. Nothing in this chapter affects the direct sale and
shipment of wine or beer under IC 7.1-3-26.
SECTION 30. IC 7.1-4-4.1-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.285-2019,
SECTION 53, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) This section applies to the following
biennial permits:
(1) Beer dealer's permit.
(2) Liquor dealer's permit.
(3) Wine dealer's permit.
This section does not apply to a beer or wine dealer's permit under
section 12.5 of this chapter.
(b) The commission shall charge a single fee for the issuance of any
combination of dealers' permits issued for the same location. The fee
is equal to the sum of the amount determined under subsection (c).
(c) An annual permit fee in the following amount is imposed on a
dealer:
(1) Five hundred dollars ($500), if the dealer sells only beer, only
liquor, or only wine.
(2) Seven hundred fifty dollars ($750), if the dealer sells:
(A) both beer and wine but no liquor;
(B) both wine and liquor but no beer; or
(C) both beer and liquor but no wine.
(3) One thousand dollars ($1,000), if the dealer sells beer, wine,
and liquor.
SECTION 31. IC 7.1-4-4.1-12.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12.5. (a) This section applies to a
beer dealer's or wine dealer's permit under IC 7.1-3-22.5.
(b) The initial permit fee is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
(c) The annual permit renewal fee is two thousand five hundred
dollars ($2,500).
(d) The commission shall deposit all fees collected under this
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


section into the enforcement and administration fund established
under IC 7.1-4-10.
SECTION 32. IC 7.1-4-4.1-22 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 22. The annual direct beer seller's
permit fee is one hundred fifty dollars ($150).
SECTION 33. IC 7.1-4-4.1-23 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. (a) The term of a delivery
service permit under IC 7.1-3-34 is two (2) years.
(b) The initial permit fee is fifty thousand dollars ($50,000).
(c) The biennial renewal fee is five thousand dollars ($5,000).
(d) The commission shall deposit all fees collected under this
section into the enforcement and administration fund established
under IC 7.1-4-10.
SECTION 34. IC 7.1-4-4.1-24 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 24. (a) The fee for a delivery
driver permit is one hundred dollars ($100). The term of a delivery
driver permit is three (3) years.
(b) The commission shall deposit all fees collected under this
section into the enforcement and administration fund established
under IC 7.1-4-10.
SECTION 35. IC 7.1-4-6-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.165-2006,
SECTION 36, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The chairman and the department shall have the
power to examine the books, papers, records, and premises of a
manufacturer, wholesaler, retailer, dealer, or direct wine seller's permit
holder, or direct beer seller's permit holder under this title for the
purpose of determining whether the excise taxes imposed by this title
have been paid fully and whether the provisions of the title are being
complied with.
SECTION 36. IC 7.1-4-7-1, AS AMENDED BY P.L.109-2013,
SECTION 8, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 1. The chairman shall collect the required annual
license fee paid in connection with the issuance of a brewer's permit,
a beer wholesaler's permit, a temporary beer permit, a dining car permit
of any type, a boat permit of any type, an artisan distiller's permit, a
distiller's permit, a rectifier's permit, a liquor wholesaler's permit, a
vintner's permit, a farm winery permit, a farm winery brandy distiller's
permit, a wine wholesaler's permit, a wine bottler's permit, a temporary
wine permit, a direct wine seller's permit, a direct beer seller's
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


permit, a salesman's permit, and a carrier's alcoholic permit.
SECTION 37. IC 7.1-5-5-7, AS AMENDED BY P.L.159-2014,
SECTION 37, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 7. (a) It is unlawful for a permittee in a sale or
contract to sell alcoholic beverages to discriminate between purchasers
by granting a price, discount, allowance, or service charge which is not
available to all purchasers at the same time. However, this section does
not authorize or require a permittee to sell to a person to whom the
permittee is not authorized to sell under this title.
(b) A premises that operates at least two (2) restaurants that are
separate and distinct from each other on the same premises may
provide for a different schedule of prices in each restaurant if each
restaurant conforms to all other laws and rules of the commission
regarding pricing and price discrimination in its separate and distinct
areas.
(c) This section does not apply to the holder of a gaming site permit
that complies with IC 7.1-3-17.5-6.
(d) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a beer wholesaler may offer a
special discount price to a beer dealer or beer retailer for beer or
flavored malt beverage, if the beer or flavored malt beverage:
(1) is a brand or package the beer wholesaler has discontinued; or
(2) will expire in not more than:
(A) twenty (20) days for packaged beer or packaged flavored
malt beverage; and
(B) ten (10) days for draft beer or draft flavored malt beverage.
(e) The special discount under subsection (d) only applies to beer or
flavored malt beverage that will expire and be subject to removal from
retailer or dealer shelves in accordance with the primary source of
supply's coding data clearly identified on the container.
(f) Any beer or flavored malt beverage sold at a special discount
price under subsection (d) shall be accompanied by an invoice clearly
designating, in addition to all other information required by law, all the
following information:
(1) The date of delivery.
(2) The expiration date of each brand, package type, and quantity
delivered.
(3) The per unit price for each package.
(g) Notwithstanding subsection (a), a wine wholesaler may offer
a channel price (as defined in IC 7.1-1-3-9.3) to a retailer if the
following conditions are met:
(1) The channel price and product name must be clearly and
separately noted on the invoice for the sale of the channel
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


priced product.
(2) A retailer may only offer a channel priced product for
consumption on the licensed premises.
(3) Channel priced products must be listed on the wine
wholesaler's price sheet and offered in a nondiscriminatory
manner to all retailers.
(4) A wine wholesaler must annually submit to the
commission, by January 1, a list of all products sold for a
channel price during the previous twelve (12) month period.
This list must contain the following:
(A) The name of the channel priced product.
(B) The price for which the channel priced product was
sold.
(C) The price for which the same product, in the same
quantity, would have been sold without a channel price.
(5) A wine wholesaler may not offer a channel price to a
retailer that participates in a group purchasing agreement
under IC 7.1-2-3-32.
(h) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a seller
from operating a rewards program under section 14 of this
chapter.
(g) (i) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates this section
commits a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 38. IC 7.1-5-5-14 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA CODE
AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE JULY
1, 2026]: Sec. 14. (a) As used in this section, "rewards program"
means a program used by a retailer to encourage participants to
continue to patronize the retailer's business by allowing
participants to do the following:
(1) Accrue program benefits in the form of points that are
rewarded to a participant for purchases of food or alcoholic
beverages.
(2) Redeem accrued points in the form of a discount upon
subsequent purchases of alcoholic beverages, food, or both
food and alcoholic beverages.
(b) A retailer that operates a rewards program may:
(1) offer benefits or rewards to participants of the rewards
program that are not offered to other consumers; and
(2) require a participant in a rewards program to pay an
annual fee and renewal fee to join or continue to participate
in the rewards program.
(c) A rewards program must be structured so that the accrual
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


and redemption of benefits is applied without discrimination across
all brands and labels of alcoholic beverages. However, rewards
program benefits may differentiate between beer, wine, and liquor
(classes of alcoholic beverages) in accrual and redemption rate.
(d) A rewards program may not discount the price of an
alcoholic beverage below the cost to the retailer.
SECTION 39. IC 7.1-5-10-12, AS AMENDED BY P.L.164-2025,
SECTION 15, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 12. (a) Except as provided in subsections (b)
through (d) (e) and subsection (g), subsections (h) and (i), it is
unlawful for a permittee to sell, offer to sell, purchase or receive, an
alcoholic beverage for anything other than cash. A permittee who
extends credit in violation of this section shall have no right of action
on the claim.
(b) A permittee may credit to a purchaser the actual price charged
for a package or an original container returned by the original
purchaser as a credit on a sale and refund to a purchaser the amount
paid by the purchaser for a container, or as a deposit on a container, if
it is returned to the permittee.
(c) A manufacturer may extend usual and customary credit for
alcoholic beverages sold to a customer who maintains a place of
business outside this state when the alcoholic beverages are actually
shipped to a point outside this state.
(d) An artisan distiller, a distiller, a farm winery, or a liquor or wine
wholesaler may extend credit on liquor, flavored malt beverages, and
wine sold to a permittee for a period of fifteen (15) days from the date
of invoice, date of invoice included. However, if the fifteen (15) day
period passes without payment in full, the:
(1) wholesaler;
(2) farm winery that sells and delivers under IC 7.1-3-12-5(a)(13);
or
(3) artisan distillery that sells and delivers under
IC 7.1-3-27-8(a)(11);
shall sell to that permittee on a cash on delivery basis only.
(e) A beer wholesaler may extend credit to a retailer or catering
hall.
(e) (f) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates this section
commits a Class B misdemeanor.
(f) (g) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a hotel,
restaurant, caterer, or a club that is not open to the general public from
extending credit to a consumer purchasing alcohol for personal use at
any time.
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


(g) (h) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a retailer
or dealer from accepting a:
(1) credit card;
(2) debit card;
(3) charge card; or
(4) stored value card;
from a consumer purchasing alcohol for personal use.
(i) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a
retailer from operating a rewards program under IC 7.1-5-5-14.
SECTION 40. IC 7.1-5-10-20, AS AMENDED BY P.L.163-2025,
SECTION 52, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 20. (a) It is unlawful for a holder of a retailer's
permit to do any of the following:
(1) Furnish two (2) or more servings of an alcoholic beverage
upon the placing of an order for one (1) serving to one (1) person
for that person's personal consumption.
(2) Charge a single price for the required purchase of two (2) or
more servings of an alcoholic beverage.
(3) Except as expressly authorized under IC 7.1-3-6.1 or
IC 7.1-3-6.2, conduct, sponsor, or participate in or allow a person
on the licensed premises to conduct, sponsor, or participate in any
game or contest on the licensed premises that:
(A) is determined by the quantity of alcoholic beverages
consumed by an individual or individuals; or
(B) awards alcoholic beverages or reduced price alcoholic
beverages as prizes for the game or contest.
(4) Sell or serve an unlimited or indefinite amount of alcoholic
beverages for a fixed price or charge individual patrons an entry
or cover fee to allow access to unlimited quantities of alcoholic
beverages. Nothing in this subdivision prevents a retail permit
holder from offering event packages in which the permit holder
sells and invoices an open ended quantity of alcoholic beverages
at an established price to the individuals responsible for the event.
(b) Subsection (a) applies to private clubs but does not apply to
private functions that are not open to the public.
(c) Nothing in this section may be construed to prohibit a
retailer from operating a rewards program under IC 7.1-5-5-14.
(c) (d) A person who knowingly or intentionally violates this section
commits a Class B misdemeanor.
SECTION 41. IC 24-4-22-3.5 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3.5. (a) After June 30, 2026, a person may not
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


distribute, sell, or offer for sale low THC hemp extract at retail or
online to a person who is less than twenty-one (21) years of age.
(b) Any website owned, managed, or operated by a person who
distributes or sells a low THC hemp extract directly to consumers
must verify a consumer's age before completing a purchase by:
(1) using a reliable online age verification service; or
(2) obtaining and examining a copy of a government issued
identification.
(c) A person who violates this section is subject to the following:
(1) Notwithstanding IC 34-28-5-4, a person who:
(A) violates this section; and
(B) does not have a prior unrelated judgment for a
violation of this section;
commits a Class C infraction and is subject to a civil penalty
of not more than one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(2) A person who has only one (1) prior unrelated judgment
for a violation of this section commits a Class B infraction. If
the person's violation:
(A) occurs more than two (2) years after the preceding
violation, the person is liable for the penalty set forth in
IC 34-28-5-4; or
(B) occurs not more than two (2) years after the preceding
violation:
(i) the person is liable for a civil penalty of not more than
five thousand dollars ($5,000); and
(ii) the person's retail merchant's certificate issued under
IC 6-2.5-8 shall be suspended for a period of not more
than six (6) months.
(3) A person who has at least two (2) prior unrelated
judgments for a violation of this section commits a Class A
infraction. If the person's violation:
(A) occurs more than two (2) years after the immediately
preceding violation, the person is liable for the penalty set
forth in IC 34-28-5-4; or
(B) occurs not more than two (2) years after the
immediately preceding violation:
(i) the person is liable for a civil penalty of ten thousand
dollars ($10,000);
(ii) the person's retail merchant certificate under
IC 6-2.5-8 shall be revoked; and
(iii) the person shall be subject to a one (1) year waiting
period to reapply for a retail merchant's certificate
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


under IC 6-2.5-8.
(d) It is a defense to a violation under this section that the
distributor or seller examined the purchaser's or recipient's
driver's license, or other valid government issued identification,
that positively identified the purchaser or recipient as being at least
twenty-one (21) years of age.
SECTION 42. IC 35-46-1-23 IS ADDED TO THE INDIANA
CODE AS A NEW SECTION TO READ AS FOLLOWS
[EFFECTIVE JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 23. (a) This section applies to a
holder of a delivery service permit under IC 7.1-3-34 who makes
a delivery:
(1) using a delivery driver; and
(2) that violates:
(A) IC 7.1-5-7-8 (furnishing alcoholic beverage to a minor);
(B) IC 7.1-5-10-15 (delivering to an intoxicated person); or
(C) IC 7.1-5-10-23 (failing to verify age).
(b) In addition to any other penalty, a civil judgment may be
imposed against the holder of the delivery service permit for whom
the delivery driver made the delivery as follows:
(1) If the permit holder has not been issued a citation or
summons for a violation under subsection (a) in the previous
one hundred eighty (180) days, a civil penalty of up to two
hundred dollars ($200).
(2) If the permit holder has had one (1) citation or summons
for a violation under subsection (a) in the previous one
hundred eighty (180) days, a civil penalty of up to four
hundred dollars ($400).
(3) If the permit holder has had two (2) citations or
summonses for a violation of subsection (a) in the previous
one hundred eighty (180) days, a civil penalty of up to seven
hundred dollars ($700).
(4) If the permit holder has had three (3) or more citations or
summonses for a violation under subsection (a) in the
previous one hundred eighty (180) days, a civil penalty of up
to one thousand dollars ($1,000).
(c) The defenses set forth in IC 7.1-5-7-5.1 are available to a
permit holder in an action under this section for a violation of
IC 7.1-5-7-8.
(d) Unless a person less than twenty-one (21) years of age buys
or receives an alcoholic beverage under the direction of a law
enforcement officer as part of an enforcement action, the permit
holder is not liable under subsection (a)(1) or (a)(3) unless the
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87


person less than twenty-one (21) years of age who bought or
received the alcoholic beverage is charged for violating
IC 7.1-5-7-7.
(e) All civil penalties collected under this section shall be
deposited in the alcohol and tobacco commission's enforcement
and administration fund under IC 7.1-4-10.
SECTION 43. IC 35-52-7-2, AS ADDED BY P.L.169-2014,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 2. IC 7.1-3-26-5 defines a crime concerning direct
wine seller's permits or direct beer seller's permits.
SECTION 44. IC 35-52-7-3, AS ADDED BY P.L.169-2014,
SECTION 2, IS AMENDED TO READ AS FOLLOWS [EFFECTIVE
JULY 1, 2026]: Sec. 3. IC 7.1-3-26-6 defines a crime concerning direct
wine seller's permits or direct beer seller's permits.
2026 IN 1079—LS 6391/DI 87